District of Columbia statutes.
20-1106

Distribution to a minor.

(a)

If a personal representative is required to distribute assets of an estate to a minor, and if the will contains a direction or grants discretion to the personal representative with regard to the manner of making such a distribution, then the personal representative shall make distribution in accordance with that direction or discretion without the need for any order of the Court.

(b)

If a personal representative is required to distribute assets of an estate to a minor, and if there is no will or if the will does not give any direction or discretion to the personal representative with regard to such a distribution, then the personal representative may make such distribution as follows:

(1)

without the need for any order of the Court, in the following order of priority:

(A)

to the guardian of the minor if the guardian has filed with the Court a copy of the guardian’s appointment as guardian and an order authorizing such guardian to receive such distribution authenticated pursuant to 28 U.S.C. § 1738; or

(B)

to the custodian selected or approved by the personal representative for the minor under the Uniform Gifts (or Transfers) to Minors Act of any jurisdiction, subject to the limits, if any, under such applicable act on the property which may be received and held by such custodian; or

(2)

in any other manner approved by the Court.

(c)

When a personal representative distributes assets in accordance with this section, the personal representative shall obtain a voucher, signed by the distributee, indicating receipt of the property distributed.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 3(b), 33 DCR 278
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(ooo), 42 DCR 63
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-1102.
1981 Ed., § 20-1106.
This section is referenced in § 21-305.
Transfer to minor authorized by will or trust, see § 21-305.